Utah statutes.
75-3-911.   Partition for purpose of distribution.
When two or more heirs or devisees are entitled to distribution of undivided
interests in any real or personal property of the estate, the personal
representative or one or more of the heirs or devisees may petition the court,
prior to the formal or informal closing of the estate, to make partition.
After notice to the interested heirs or devisees, the court shall partition
the property in the same manner as provided by the law for civil actions of
partition. The court may direct the personal representative to sell any
property which cannot be partitioned without prejudice to the owners and which
cannot conveniently be allotted to any one party.
